District of Columbia statutes.
48-712

Civil infractions.

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any violation of this chapter or the rules issued pursuant to this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 13, 37 DCR 2631

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-1012.